Florida, session 2026, HB471.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1012.02, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1012.02 Statewide strategic plan for the recruitment and
retention of speech-language pathologists and the provision of
quality services.—
(1) The Department of Education shall develop and maintain
a statewide strategic plan for recruiting and retaining speech-
language pathologists and assuring that quality services are
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb471-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 471 2026
provided to students with speech-language disabilities. At a
minimum, the plan must include, but is not limited to, all of
the following:
(a) The analysis of relevant data to determine the
specific staffing needs of school districts and charter schools.
Such analysis must be ongoing throughout the school year and
must include:
1. The total number of public schools, disaggregated by
school district and charter school.
2. The number of speech-language pathologists employed at
each school and school district, including speech-language
pathologists who are contracted personnel.
3. The number of employees and contracted personnel per
school district or charter school who are:
a. Doctoral-level speech-language pathologists.
b. Master-level speech-language pathologists.
c. Bachelor-level speech-language therapists.
d. Speech-language pathology assistants.
4. An examination of the caseloads and compensation of
such employees and contracted personnel and a comparison of such
caseloads and compensation between school districts and charter
schools and in contiguous states.
(b) Tracking the changes in the number of employees and
contracted personnel listed in subparagraph (a)3. from year to
year, including resignations and retirements.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb471-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 471 2026
(c) An examination of strategies for addressing challenges
school districts and charter schools face in the recruitment and
retention of the employees and contracted personnel listed in
subparagraph (a)3., including, but not limited to:
1. Tuition assistance programs.
2. Continuing education opportunities.
3. Expanding opportunities for such employees and
contracted personnel to work full-time, part-time, or on another
hybrid schedule with continued benefits.
4. Establishing hybrid work environments.
5. Establishing differentiated pay for speech-language
pathologists.
6. Expanding mentorships for speech-language pathologists
for newly employed speech-language pathologists.
(d) An estimation of the costs to implement the strategies
outlined in paragraph (c), including the extent to which
federal, state, and local funds could be used to support such
implementation.
(e) The development and implementation of a weighted
calculation methodology for determining a caseload and workload
plan for speech-language pathologists. The plan must be based on
an analysis of the activities and populations for which the
speech-language pathologists are responsible and, at a minimum,
must include sufficient time for all of the following:
1. Individualized therapeutic instruction and
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb471-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 471 2026
interventions for students.
2. Diagnostic and evaluation-specific speech, language,
and literacy.
3. Consultation services and collaboration among staff
members.
4. Attendance at individual education plan meetings and
other staff conferences, as appropriate.
5. Required documentation and reporting.
6. Medicaid billing and related activities.
7. Response to student interventions.
(f) The amount of Medicaid revenue that is annually:
1. Generated by speech-language pathologist activities.
2. Obtained through speech-language pathologist activities
and is transferred to the school district's or charter school's
general revenue fund.
3. Used for speech-language pathologists' pay supplements,
stipends, continued professional training, and therapeutic
materials.
(2)(a) The department shall create a survey for each
school district and charter school to complete to gather the
data required under subsection (1).
(b) Each school district and charter school must complete
and submit such survey to the department no later than October
31 of each year.
100 (c) No later than November 30 of each year, the department
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb471-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 471 2026
101 shall publish the statewide strategic plan on its website, which
102 includes the integration of school district and charter school
103 data and information, and provide an update on the department's
104 progress in developing and implementing the statewide strategic
105 plan to the appropriate substantive committees of the Senate and
106 House of Representatives.
107 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb471-00